Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.091, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Copy of list to registered voter. The county auditors and the secretary of state shall provide copies of the public information lists in electronic or other media to any voter registered in Minnesota within deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin two businessnew text end days of receiving a written or electronic request accompanied by payment of the cost of reproduction. The county auditors and the secretary of state shall make a copy of the list available for public inspection without cost. An individual who inspects or acquires a copy of a public information list may not use any information contained in it for purposes unrelated to elections, political activities, or law enforcement. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end